Missouri, session 2026, HB2041.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 475.010, 475.040, 475.050, 475.060, 475.061, 475.075, 475.082,
475.115, 475.120, and 475.361, RSMo, are repealed and ten new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 475.010, 475.040, 475.050, 475.060, 475.061, 475.075,
475.082, 475.115, 475.120, and 475.361, to read as follows:
475.010. When used in this chapter, unless otherwise apparent from the context, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Adult", a person who has reached the age of eighteen years;
(2) "Claims", liabilities of the protectee arising in contract, in tort or otherwise, before
or after the appointment of a conservator, and liabilities of the estate which arise at or after the
adjudication of disability or after the appointment of a conservator of the estate, including
expenses of the adjudication and of administration. The term does not include demands or
disputes regarding title of the protectee to specific assets alleged to be included in the estate;
(3) "Conservator", one appointed by a court to have the care and custody of the estate
of a minor or a disabled person. A "limited conservator" is one whose duties or powers are
limited. The term "conservator", as used in this chapter, includes limited conservator unless
otherwise specified or apparent from the context;
(4) "Conservator ad litem", one appointed by the court in which particular litigation is
pending regarding the management of financial resources on behalf of a minor, a disabled
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2041 2
person, or an unborn person in that particular proceeding or as otherwise specified in this
chapter;
(5) "Custodial parent", the parent of a minor who has been awarded sole or joint
physical custody of such minor, or the parent of an incapacitated person who has been
appointed as guardian of such person, by an order or judgment of a court of this state or of
another state or territory of the United States, or if there is no such order or judgment, the
parent with whom the minor or incapacitated person primarily resides;
(6) "Disabled" or "disabled person", one who is:
(a) Unable by reason of any physical, mental, or cognitive condition to receive and
evaluate information or to communicate decisions to such an extent that the person lacks
ability to manage the person's financial resources; or
(b) The term disabled or disabled person, as used in this chapter includes the terms
partially disabled or partially disabled person unless otherwise specified or apparent from the
context;
(7) "Eligible person" or "qualified person", a natural person, social service agency,
corporation or national or state banking organization qualified to act as guardian of the person
or conservator of the estate pursuant to the provisions of section 475.055;
(8) "Guardian", one appointed by a court to have the care and custody of the person of
a minor or of an incapacitated person. A "limited guardian" is one whose duties or powers are
limited. A "standby guardian" is one approved by the court to temporarily assume the duties
of guardian of a minor or of an incapacitated person under section 475.046. The term
guardian, as used in this chapter, includes limited guardian and standby guardian unless
otherwise specified or apparent from the context;
(9) "Guardian ad litem", one appointed by a court, in which particular litigation is
pending on behalf of a minor, an incapacitated person, a disabled person, or an unborn person
in that particular proceeding or as otherwise specified in this code;
(10) "Guardianship classification", classifications of guardianship that include
the following:
(a) "General guardianship", a guardianship in which a guardian ad litem is
appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be disabled
or a guardian is appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be totally or partially incapacitated because of a physical, cognitive, or mental
condition. With respect to the guardianship order and the exercise of power by the
guardian or guardian ad litem, the guardian or guardian ad litem appointed may
pursue a course of action or an alternative that allows the person to live, learn, and
work with minimum restrictions, as deemed appropriate based on the incapacitated or
disabled person's physical, cognitive, or mental condition and financial means;

HB 2041 3
(b) "Specialized guardianship", a guardianship in which a guardian ad litem is
appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be disabled
or a guardian is appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be totally or partially incapacitated because of a physical, cognitive, or mental
condition and a medical condition that requires specialized medical care, treatment,
support, supervision, habilitation, or maintenance and without which the person's life,
health, welfare, or safety is in imminent danger. A guardian or guardian ad litem
appointed under a specialized guardianship may pursue a course of action or an
alternative that allows the incapacitated or disabled person to live, learn, and work with
minimum restrictions considering the person's physical, cognitive, mental, medical, or
other health care-related condition and financial means;
(c) "Forensic guardianship", a guardianship in which a guardian ad litem is
appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be disabled
or a guardian is appointed to a person who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be totally or partially incapacitated because of a physical, cognitive, or mental
condition, but also:
a. Has a substantial criminal history of serious offenses;
b. Is on supervised or unsupervised probation or parole;
c. Is currently under a court order requiring or prohibiting a specified act or
action;
d. Is required to register as a sex offender; or
e. Has demonstrated substantial cause to believe the person is a danger to
himself, herself, or others or is likely to commit an offense or violate any term or
condition of his or her probation or parole or any court order.

Under a forensic guardianship, the guardianship shall operate as set forth under section
475.120;
(11) "Habilitation", a process of treatment, training, care, or specialized attention that
seeks to enhance and maximize the ability of a person with an intellectual disability, a mental
illness, a cognitive disability,or a developmental disability to cope with the environment and
to live as determined by the person as much as possible, as is appropriate for the person
considering his or her physical, cognitive, and mental condition and financial means or as
otherwise necessary or required by a specialized guardianship or forensic guardianship;
[(11)] (12) "Incapacitated person", one who is unable by reason of any physical,
mental, or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or to communicate
decisions to such an extent that the person, even with appropriate services and assistive
technology, lacks capacity to manage the person's essential requirements for food, clothing,

HB 2041 4
shelter, safety or other care such that serious physical injury, illness, or disease is likely to
occur. The term incapacitated person as used in this chapter includes the term partially
incapacitated person unless otherwise specified or apparent from the context;
[(12)] (13) "Interested persons", spouses, children, parents, adult members of a ward's
or protectee's family, creditors or any others having a property right or claim against the estate
of a protectee being administered, trustees of a trust of which the ward or protectee is a
beneficiary, agents of a durable power of attorney for a ward or protectee, and children of a
protectee who may have a property right or claim against or an interest in the estate of a
protectee. This meaning may vary at different stages and different parts of a proceeding and
shall be determined according to the particular purpose and matter involved;
[(13)] (14) "Least restrictive alternative", with respect to the guardianship order and
100 the exercise of power by the guardian and consistent with the guardianship classification,
101 a course of action or an alternative that allows the incapacitated person to live, learn, and
102 work with minimum restrictions on the person, as are appropriate for the person considering
103 his or her physical, cognitive, medical, and mental condition and financial means. Least
104 restrictive alternative also means, taking into consideration the guardianship classification
105 and appropriateness for the person, choosing the decision or approach that:
106 (a) Places the least possible restriction on the person's personal liberty and exercise of
107 rights and that promotes the greatest possible inclusion of the person into his or her
108 community, as is appropriate for the person considering his or her physical, cognitive,
109 medical, and mental condition and financial means and his or her guardianship
110 classification; and
111 (b) Is consistent with meeting the person's essential requirements for health, safety,
112 habilitation, welfare, life, treatment, and recovery and protecting the person from abuse,
113 neglect, unnatural death, and financial exploitation;
114 [(14)] (15) "Manage financial resources", either those actions necessary to obtain,
115 administer, and dispose of real and personal property, intangible property, business property,
116 benefits, income or any assets, or those actions necessary to prevent waste, loss or dissipation
117 of property, or those actions necessary to provide for the care and support of such person or
118 anyone legally dependent upon such person by a person of ordinary skills and intelligence
119 commensurate with his or her training and education;
120 [(15)] (16) "Minor", any person who is under the age of eighteen years;
121 [(16)] (17) "Parent", the biological or adoptive mother or father of a child whose
122 parental rights have not been terminated under chapter 211, including:
123 (a) A person registered as the father of the child by reason of an unrevoked notice of
124 intent to claim paternity under section 192.016;

HB 2041 5
125 (b) A person who has acknowledged paternity of the child and has not rescinded that
126 acknowledgment under section 193.215; and
127 (c) A person presumed to be the natural father of the child under section 210.822;
128 [(17)] (18) "Partially disabled person", one who is unable by reason of any physical,
129 mental, or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or to communicate
130 decisions to such an extent that such person lacks capacity to manage, in part, his or her
131 financial resources;
132 [(18)] (19) "Partially incapacitated person", one who is unable by reason of any
133 physical, mental, or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or to
134 communicate decisions to the extent that such person lacks capacity to meet, in part,
135 essential requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety, or other care without court-ordered
136 assistance;
137 [(19)] (20) "Protectee", a person for whose estate a conservator or limited conservator
138 has been appointed or with respect to whose estate a transaction has been authorized by the
139 court under section 475.092 without appointment of a conservator or limited conservator;
140 [(20)] (21) "Seriously ill", a significant likelihood that a person will become
141 incapacitated or die within twelve months;
142 [(21)] (22) "Social service agency", a charitable organization organized and
143 incorporated as a not-for-profit corporation under the laws of this state and which qualifies as
144 an exempt organization within the meaning of Section 501(c)(3), or any successor provision
145 thereto of the federal Internal Revenue Code;
146 [(22)] (23) "Standby guardian", one who is authorized to have the temporary care and
147 custody of the person of a minor or of an incapacitated person under the provisions of section
148 475.046;
149 [(23)] (24) "Treatment", the prevention, amelioration or cure of a person's physical,
150 medical, cognitive, intellectual, developmental, and mental illnesses or incapacities;
151 [(24)] (25) "Ward", a minor or an incapacitated person for whom a guardian, limited
152 guardian, or standby guardian has been appointed.
475.040. If it appears to the court, acting on the petition of the guardian as set forth
under section 475.120, the conservator, the respondent or of a ward over the age of fourteen,
or on its own motion, at any time before the termination of the guardianship or
conservatorship, that the proceeding was commenced in the wrong county, or that the
domicile of the ward or protectee has changed to another county, or in case of conservatorship
of the estate that it would be for the best interest of the ward or disabled person and his estate,
the court may order the proceeding with all papers, files and a transcript of the proceedings
transferred to the probate division of the circuit court of another county. The court to which
the transfer is made shall take jurisdiction of the case, place the transcript of record and

HB 2041 6
proceed to the final settlement of the case as if the appointment originally had been made by
it.
475.050. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, before appointing any other
eligible person as guardian of an incapacitated person, or conservator of a disabled person, the
court shall [consider the suitability of appointing any of] appoint one of the following
persons, listed in the order of priority, who are qualified under section 475.055, are
suitable, and appear to be willing to serve:
(1) If the incapacitated or disabled person is, at the time of the hearing, able to make
and communicate a reasonable choice, any eligible person nominated by the person;
(2) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, any eligible person nominated in a durable
power of attorney executed by the incapacitated or disabled person, or in an instrument in
writing signed by the incapacitated or disabled person and by two witnesses who signed at the
incapacitated or disabled person's request, before the inception of the person's incapacity or
disability;
(3) The spouse, parents, adult children, adult brothers and sisters and other close adult
relatives of the incapacitated or disabled person or any person nominated by a previous
guardian, provided that the guardian is in good standing with the court;
(4) Any other eligible person or, with respect to the estate only, any eligible
organization or corporation, nominated in a duly probated will of such a spouse or relative.
2. Consistent with subsection 4 of section 475.120 or section 475.343, when
making its decision regarding whom to appoint as guardian of an incapacitated person,
the court shall not include the financial resources of the prospective guardian in
determining who is an eligible person under subsection 1 of this section.
3. If the incapacitated person is to reside with the prospective guardian and a
complaint is made against the prospective guardian claiming the guardian is unsuitable
because the guardian resides in substandard housing that presents a dangerous or
insanitary condition for the incapacitated person and such condition would jeopardize
the incapacitated person's health, safety, welfare, or life, the court shall not disqualify
the prospective guardian unless it is proved that the substandard housing exists and is
the result of the prospective guardian's willful negligence. The court shall cause the
department of health and senior services to investigate and file a report with the court
on its findings before the court makes a determination regarding whom to appoint as
guardian.
4. If an incapacitated person currently resides in or will reside in any dwelling
other than with the prospective guardian and a complaint is filed with the court that
either the current or the prospective dwelling is substandard and presents a dangerous
or insanitary condition that would jeopardize the incapacitated person's life, health,

HB 2041 7
safety, or welfare, the court shall cause the department of health and senior services or
department of mental health to investigate and file a report with the court on its
findings, for which the court shall give weight when determining whom to appoint as
guardian.
5. Substandard housing includes, but is not limited to, any existing or
prospective circumstance or situation that places the incapacitated person in jeopardy
of being physically, sexually, or emotionally abused or neglected or killed because of the
willful negligence to prevent or correct the circumstance or situation by the eligible
person under subsection 1 of this section.
6. The court shall not deny a petition for guardianship because:
(1) The petitioner resides in a low-income dwelling or low-income housing
district or area;
(2) The petitioner's financial income is the result of any disability that qualifies
him or her for any type of Social Security income;
(3) Of the petitioner's employment wages; or
(4) The petitioner is unemployed at the time of petitioning the court for
guardianship.
7. Consistent with the rights given to wards under subdivision (5) of subsection 1
of section 475.361, the court shall consider the wishes of the incapacitated person as to
whom the incapacitated person wishes to reside with and where the incapacitated
person wishes to reside when determining the eligible person under subsection 1 of this
section, provided that the court finds the wishes of the incapacitated person are in his or
her best interests in accordance with this section.
8. The court shall not appoint an unrelated third party as a guardian or conservator
unless there is no relative suitable and willing to serve or if the appointment of a relative or
nominee is otherwise contrary to the best interests of the incapacitated or disabled person. If
the incapacitated or disabled person is a minor under the care of the children's division and is
entering adult guardianship or conservatorship, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that he or
she has no relative suitable and willing to serve as guardian or conservator.
[3.] 9. Except for good cause shown, the court shall make its appointment in
accordance with the incapacitated or disabled person's most recent valid nomination of an
eligible person qualified to serve as guardian of the person or conservator of the estate or the
nomination made by a previous guardian or conservator who is in good standing with
the court if the incapacitated or disabled person is not capable of making his own or her
own decisions.
[4.] 10. Except for [those individuals specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection] public administrators, the court shall require all guardians and conservators who

HB 2041 8
are seeking appointment and who have a fiduciary responsibility to a ward, an incapacitated
person, or a disabled person to submit at their own expense to a background screening that
shall include the disqualification lists of the departments of mental health, social services, and
health and senior services; the abuse and neglect registries for adults and children; a Missouri
criminal record review; and the sexual offender registry. Individuals seeking appointment as
a conservator shall also submit, at their own expense, to a credit history investigation. The
nominated guardian or conservator shall file the results of the reports with the court at least
ten days prior to the appointment hearing date unless waived or modified by the court for
good cause shown by an affidavit filed simultaneously with the petition for appointment or in
the event the protected person requests an expedited hearing. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to[:
(1)] public administrators;[ or
(2) The ward's, incapacitated person's, or disabled person's spouse, parents, children
who have reached eighteen years of age, or siblings who have reached eighteen years of age]
except that, the public administrator shall comply with the provisions of this subsection
by maintaining a copy of his or her criminal history record check and disqualification
list and credit check records with the county commission for the court's inspection as
the court deems necessary. Credit check records shall not be public records.
[5. Guardians certified by a national accrediting organization may file proof of
certification in lieu of the requirements of subsections 4 and 6 of this section. ] 11. At any
time the court may, upon its own motion or upon receiving a notice or complaint from
another person or entity, order the guardian, guardian ad litem, or conservator to
submit to a criminal background check, fingerprint check, sex offender registry check,
or disqualification list check from the department of mental health, department of social
services, or department of health and senior services. The guardian, guardian ad litem,
or conservator shall be given:
(1) Notice of the order;
100 (2) The reason or reasons for the order;
101 (3) If a notice or complaint was filed with the court, the identity of the person or
102 entity filing the notice or complaint and a copy of the specific notice or complaint given
103 to the court; and
104 (4) A hearing with good cause shown. Regardless of whether legal counsel is
105 retained, the guardian, guardian ad litem, or conservator may file a motion with the
106 court to receive an order from the court for reimbursement of all financial costs
107 associated with a notice or complaint filed under this subsection, and the court shall
108 grant the motion if the court determines after the hearing that the notice or complaint
109 was knowingly and intentionally false, with malice, in bad faith, or with the purpose to

HB 2041 9
110 obstruct or prevent the guardian, guardian ad litem, or conservator from discharging
111 his or her duties and exercising his or her authority in his or her guardian, guardian ad
112 litem, or conservator capacity.
113 [6.] 12. An order appointing a guardian or conservator shall not be signed by the
114 judge until such reports have been filed with the court and reviewed by the judge, who shall
115 consider the reports in determining whether to appoint a guardian or conservator. Such
116 reports, or lack thereof, shall be certified either by an affidavit or by obtaining a certified copy
117 of the reports. No reports or national criminal history record check shall be required by the
118 court upon the application of a petitioner for an emergency temporary guardianship or
119 emergency temporary conservatorship. The court may waive the requirements of this
120 subsection for good cause shown. If appointed, a guardian or conservator may petition the
121 court for reimbursement of the reasonable expenses of the credit history investigation and
122 background screenings.
475.060. 1. Any person may file a petition for the appointment of himself or herself
or some other qualified person as guardian of a minor. Such petition shall state:
(1) The name, age, domicile, actual place of residence and post office address of the
minor if known and if any of these facts is unknown, the efforts made to ascertain that fact;
(2) The estimated value of the minor's real and personal property, and the location and
value of any real property owned by the minor outside of this state;
(3) If the minor has no domicile or place of residence in this state, the county in which
the property or major part thereof of the minor is located;
(4) The name and address of the parents of the minor and whether they are living or
dead;
(5) The name and address of the spouse, and the names, ages and addresses of all
living children of the minor;
(6) The name and address of the person having custody of the person of the minor or
who claims to have custody of the person of the minor;
(7) The name and address of any guardian of the person or conservator of the estate of
the minor appointed in this or any other state;
(8) If appointment is sought for a natural person, other than the public administrator,
the names and addresses of wards and disabled persons for whom such person is already
guardian or conservator;
(9) The name and address of the trustees and the purpose of any trust of which the
minor is a qualified beneficiary;
(10) The reasons why the appointment of a guardian is sought;
(11) A petition for the appointment of a guardian of a minor may be filed for the sole
and specific purpose of school registration or medical insurance coverage. Such a petition

HB 2041 10
shall clearly set out this limited request and shall not be combined with a petition for
conservatorship;
(12) If the petitioner requests the appointment of co-guardians, a statement of the
reasons why such appointment is sought and whether the petitioner requests that the co-
guardians, if appointed, may act independently or whether they may act only together or only
together with regard to specified matters;
(13) That written consent has been obtained from any person, including a public
administrator, who is to be appointed as a co-guardian; and
(14) Whether the petitioner knows of any other court having jurisdiction over the
minor and the name of the court, if known.
2. Any person may file a petition for the appointment of himself or herself or some
other qualified person as guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated person. Such
petition shall state:
(1) If known, the name, age, domicile, actual place of residence, and post office
address of the alleged incapacitated person, and for the period of three years before the filing
of the petition, the most recent addresses, up to three, at which the alleged incapacitated
person lived prior to the most recent address, and if any of these facts is unknown, the efforts
made to ascertain that fact. In the case of a petition filed by a public official in his or her
official capacity, the information required by this subdivision need only be supplied to the
extent it is reasonably available to the petitioner;
(2) The estimated value of the alleged incapacitated person's real and personal
property, and the location and value of any real property owned by the alleged incapacitated
person outside of this state;
(3) If the alleged incapacitated person has no domicile or place of residence in this
state, the county in which the property or major part thereof of the alleged incapacitated
person is located;
(4) The name and address of the parents of the alleged incapacitated person and
whether they are living or dead;
(5) The name and address of the spouse, the names, ages, and addresses of all living
children of the alleged incapacitated person, the names and addresses of the alleged
incapacitated person's closest known relatives, and the names and relationship, if known, of
any adults living with the alleged incapacitated person; if no spouse, adult child, or parent is
listed, the names and addresses of the siblings and children of deceased siblings of the alleged
incapacitated person; the name and address of any agent appointed by the alleged
incapacitated person in any durable power of attorney, and of the presently acting trustees of
any trust of which the alleged incapacitated person is the grantor or is a qualified beneficiary
or is or was the trustee or cotrustee and the purpose of the power of attorney or trust;

HB 2041 11
(6) The name and address of the person having custody of the person of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(7) The name and address of any guardian of the person or conservator of the estate of
the alleged incapacitated person appointed in this or any other state;
(8) If appointment is sought for a natural person, other than the public administrator,
the names and addresses of wards and protectees for whom such person is already guardian or
conservator;
(9) The factual basis for the petitioner's conclusion that the person for whom
guardianship is sought is unable or partially unable by reason of some specified physical,
mental, or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or to communicate
decisions to such an extent that the person lacks capacity to meet essential requirements for
food, clothing, shelter, safety, or other care such that serious physical injury, illness, or disease
is likely to occur;
(10) The specific guardianship classification that is being requested to create a
baseline for the guardianship classification but, at any time thereafter, the guardianship
classification may be changed without obtaining a court order;
(11) The reasons, incidents, and specific behaviors demonstrating why the
appointment of a guardian or limited guardian is sought;
[(11)] (12) If the petitioner suggests the appointment of co-guardians, a statement of
the reasons why such appointment is sought and whether the petitioner suggests that the co-
guardians, if appointed, may act independently or whether they may act only together or only
together with regard to specified matters; and
[(12)] (13) Written consent has been obtained from any person, including a public
administrator, who is to be appointed as a co-guardian.
3. If the person filing the petition seeks the appointment of an emergency guardian,
the petition shall include the same requirements as provided in subsection 1 of this section
and shall request the appointment per the requirements provided in subsection 15 of section
475.075.
475.061. 1. Any person may file a petition in the probate division of the circuit court
of the county of proper venue for the appointment of himself or herself or some other
qualified person as conservator of the estate of a minor or disabled person. The petition shall
contain the same allegations as are set forth in subdivisions (1), (8), and [(10)] (11) of
subsection 2 of section 475.060 with respect to the appointment of a guardian for an
incapacitated person and, in addition thereto, an allegation that the respondent is unable by
reason of some specific physical or cognitive condition to receive and evaluate information or
to communicate decisions to such an extent that the respondent lacks ability to manage his
financial resources or that the respondent is under the age of eighteen years.

HB 2041 12
2. A petition for appointment of a conservator or limited conservator of the estate
may be combined with a petition for appointment of a guardian or limited guardian of the
person. In such a combined petition allegations need not be repeated.
475.075. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 475.062, when a petition for the
appointment of a guardian ad litem, guardian, or conservator for any potential ward or
protectee, who is then referred to as the respondent, is filed under this chapter on grounds
other than minority, the court, if satisfied that there is good cause for the exercise of its
authority, shall promptly set the petition for hearing.
2. The respondent shall be served in person with the following: A copy of the
petition; a written notice stating the time and place the proceeding will be heard by the court,
the name and address of appointed counsel, and the names and addresses of the witnesses
who may be called to testify in support of the petition; and with a copy of the respondent's
rights as set forth in subsections 9 and 10 of this section. The notice shall be signed by the
judge or clerk of the court and served in person on the respondent a reasonable time before
the date set for the hearing. A written notice stating the time and place for the petition to be
heard by the court, and the name and address of counsel appointed to represent the respondent
shall be served upon the spouse, parents, children who have reached the age of eighteen, any
person serving as the respondent's guardian, conservator, limited guardian, or limited
conservator, any person proposed to serve as guardian or conservator, any person having
power to act in a fiduciary capacity with respect to any of the respondent's financial resources,
any person having the respondent's care and custody known to the petitioner, and any co-
tenants or co-depositors with the respondent. Each person so listed shall be served in any
manner permitted by section 472.100. If no such spouse, parent, or child is known, notice
shall be given to at least one of the respondent's closest relatives who have reached eighteen
years of age.
3. If the public administrator is nominated as guardian or conservator or at any stage
of the proceeding is being considered by the court to be nominated as guardian or conservator,
the public administrator shall receive a copy of the petition from the petitioner or the court
and any accompanying documents, including exhibits and medical opinions, receive written
notice indicating the date and time of the proceeding, and have an opportunity to attend and
be heard.
4. Upon the filing of a petition under the provisions of subsection 1 of this section or
for the approval on behalf of the respondent of a transaction pursuant to section 475.092 or
for the rendition of emergency medical treatment under the provisions of section 475.123, the
court shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent the respondent in the proceeding.
The attorney shall visit the respondent at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing unless
the court finds good cause for waiving this requirement. If the attorney finds that the

HB 2041 13
respondent is capable of understanding the matter in question or of contributing to the
advancement of the respondent's interest, the attorney shall obtain from the respondent all
possible aid. If the attorney finds that the respondent is so impaired that the respondent
cannot communicate or participate in the proceedings, the attorney shall consider all
circumstances then prevailing and act with care to safeguard and advance the interests of the
respondent.
5. If the court enters an order appointing an attorney for the respondent, it shall
specify that the attorney shall have the right to obtain all medical and financial information of
the respondent from medical care providers and financial institutions, and no medical care
provider or financial institution shall be liable for damages or otherwise for the release of this
information to the attorney appointed for the respondent. The court shall allow a reasonable
attorney's fee for the services rendered, to be taxed as costs of the proceeding. Upon entry of
appearance by private counsel on behalf of the respondent, the court may permit the court-
appointed attorney to withdraw only if after a hearing the court finds cause to permit the
withdrawal. The private counsel shall meet the requirements of the court-appointed attorney
in representing the respondent as provided in subsection 4 of this section. The respondent's
attorney shall not also serve as guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem for the respondent
unless and until a judgment granting guardianship, conservatorship, limited guardianship, or
limited conservatorship has been entered by the court. If the attorney for the respondent has
filed or intends to file an appeal of such judgment, the attorney for the respondent shall not
serve as guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem for the respondent until all proceedings in
connection with such appeal have been finally resolved. The petitioner shall not nominate an
attorney for the respondent.
6. The court may direct that the respondent be examined by a physician, licensed
psychologist, or other appropriate professional if the other professional has experience or
training in the alleged mental, physical, or cognitive impairment. The court-appointed
physician, licensed psychologist, or other professional shall, prior to examination, explain to
the respondent in simple language, the following:
(1) That the purpose of the examination is to produce evidence which may be used to
determine whether the respondent is incapacitated, disabled, partially incapacitated, or
partially disabled;
(2) That respondent has the right to remain silent;
(3) That anything respondent says may be used at the court hearing, and in making
the determination of incapacity or disability.
7. The court-appointed physician, licensed psychologist, or other professional shall
submit a report in writing to the court and to counsel for all parties. It shall not be a valid
objection to the review of the report by the court or the attorneys for the parties that the court

HB 2041 14
will be responsible for the ultimate determination of incapacity or partial incapacity. If other
objections to the report are made by any party, the court may order a hearing for the limited
purpose of determining whether the court shall admit the report. The court may allow a
reasonable fee for the services rendered by the physician, licensed psychologist, or other
professional to be taxed as costs in the proceeding.
8. If prima facie proof of partial or complete incapacity or disability, with or without
the court-ordered evaluation as provided in subsections 6 and 7 of this section, is made upon
motion by any party or the court on its own motion, a physician, licensed psychologist, or
other appropriate professional is competent and may be compelled by the court to testify as to
information acquired from the respondent, despite otherwise applicable testimonial
privileges. Evidence received under this subsection that would otherwise be privileged
and confidential may not be used in any other civil action or criminal proceeding without the
consent of the holder of the privilege. Any resulting report shall be shared with the
respondent and counsel for all parties but shall not be used in any other civil action or
criminal proceeding without the consent of the holder of the privilege.
9. The petitioner has the burden of proving incapacity, partial incapacity, disability, or
partial disability by clear and convincing evidence.
10. The respondent shall have the following rights in addition to those elsewhere
specified and shall be advised of these rights by the attorney for the respondent:
(1) The right to be represented by an attorney;
(2) The right to have a jury trial;
(3) The right to present evidence in the respondent's behalf;
(4) The right to cross-examine witnesses who testify against the respondent;
(5) The right to remain silent;
(6) The right to have the hearing opened or closed to the public as the respondent
elects;
(7) The right to a hearing conducted in accordance with the rules of evidence in civil
proceedings, except as modified by this chapter;
100 (8) The right to be present at the hearing;
101 (9) The right to appeal the court's decision.
102 11. If the court finds that the respondent possesses capacity to manage the
103 respondent's essential requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety, and other care or that
104 the respondent possesses the ability to manage the respondent's financial resources, the court
105 shall deny the petition. On the other hand, if the court finds that the capacity of the
106 respondent to receive and evaluate information or to communicate decisions is impaired to
107 such an extent as to render the respondent incapable of managing some or all of the
108 respondent's essential requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety or other care so that

HB 2041 15
109 serious physical injury, illness, or disease is likely to occur, or that the capacity of the
110 respondent to receive and evaluate information or to communicate decisions is impaired to
111 such an extent so as to render the respondent unable to manage some or all of the respondent's
112 financial resources, the court shall appoint a guardian or limited guardian, a conservator or
113 limited conservator, or both in combination.
114 12. If the court finds the respondent to be in some degree incapacitated or disabled, or
115 both, the court, in determining the degree of supervision necessary, shall apply the least
116 restrictive alternative principle as defined in this chapter and shall not restrict the respondent's
117 personal liberty or the respondent's freedom to manage the respondent's financial resources to
118 any greater extent than is necessary to protect the respondent's person and the respondent's
119 financial resources. The limitations imposed upon the authority of the guardian or
120 conservator as set forth in the findings of the court shall be stated in the letters of the guardian
121 or conservator and shall be set forth in the notice of first publication of letters of
122 conservatorship granted.
123 13. Before appointing a guardian or conservator, the court shall consider whether the
124 respondent's needs may be met without the necessity of the appointment of a guardian or
125 conservator, or both, by a less restrictive alternative including, but not limited to, the
126 following:
127 (1) Evidence that the respondent has appointed an attorney-in-fact in a durable power
128 of attorney executed by the respondent before the petition was filed;
129 (2) The management of the beneficial interests of the respondent in a trust by a
130 trustee;
131 (3) Evidence that a representative payee has been appointed to manage the
132 respondent's public benefits;
133 (4) Supported decision-making agreements or the provision of protective or
134 supportive services or arrangements provided by individuals or public or private services or
135 agencies unless prohibited by any state or federal law, rule, or regulation or a financial
136 or other conflict of interest would exist;
137 (5) The use of appropriate services or assistive technology;
138 (6) The appointment of a temporary emergency guardian ad litem or conservator ad
139 litem under subsection 15 of this section; or
140 (7) The appointment of a limited guardian or conservator.
141 14. Excluding a court order, judgment, or adjudication made before August 28,
142 2026, the court shall make and recite in its order detailed findings of fact stating:
143 (1) The extent of the respondent's physical, mental, and cognitive incapacity to
144 manage essential requirements for food, clothing, shelter, safety, or other care;

HB 2041 16
145 (2) The extent of the respondent's physical, mental, and cognitive incapacity to
146 manage the respondent's financial resources;
147 (3) Whether the respondent requires placement in a supervised living situation and, if
148 so, the degree of supervision needed;
149 (4) Whether the respondent's financial resources require supervision and, if so, the
150 nature and extent of supervision needed;
151 (5) Whether the respondent retains the right to vote;
152 (6) Whether the respondent is permitted to drive a motor vehicle if the respondent can
153 pass the required driving test; and
154 (7) Whether the respondent retains the right to marry.
155 15. If it is alleged in a petition that an alleged incapacitated or disabled respondent
156 has no guardian or conservator and an emergency exists that presents a substantial risk that
157 serious physical harm will occur to the respondent's person or irreparable damage will occur
158 to the respondent's property because of the respondent's failure or inability to provide for the
159 respondent's essential human needs or to protect the respondent's property, the court may,
160 with notice to such person's attorney, as provided in subsection 4 of this section, and service
161 of notice upon such person as provided in subsection 2 of this section, and, with or without
162 notice to other persons interested in the proceeding, after hearing, appoint an emergency
163 guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem for a specified period not to exceed ninety days and
164 for specified purposes. Except for good cause shown, the court shall hold a hearing on
165 petitions filed under this section within five business days of the filing of the petition. Orders
166 appointing the guardian or conservator ad litem may be modified upon motion and hearing.
167 Only after a hearing and a showing of continuing emergency need, the court may order the
168 extension of the appointment of an emergency guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem from
169 time to time, not to exceed ninety days each. A guardian ad litem or conservator ad litem may
170 be removed at any time and shall make any report the court requires. Proceedings under this
171 subsection shall not be employed as alternative to proceedings for the involuntary detention
172 and treatment of a mentally ill person under the provisions of chapter 632. If no petition for
173 guardianship, conservatorship, limited guardianship, or limited conservatorship has been filed
174 within the first ninety days following the granting of emergency authority under this section,
175 the court may terminate the authority granted under the emergency letters upon motion of the
176 attorney for the respondent and a finding that doing so would not be manifestly contrary to
177 the respondent's interest.
475.082. 1. At least annually, the court shall inquire into the status of every adult
ward and protectee under its jurisdiction for the purpose of determining whether the
incapacity or disability may have ceased or changed and to insure that the guardian or

HB 2041 17
conservator is discharging the guardian's or conservator's responsibilities and duties in
accordance with this chapter.
2. In order to implement the court review prescribed by this section, the guardian or
limited guardian shall file annually on the anniversary date of the guardian's or limited
guardian's letters a report concerning the personal status of the adult ward and plans by the
guardian or limited guardian for future care. Taking into consideration the ward's
physical, mental, and cognitive condition, the guardian, limited guardian, guardian ad
litem, or limited guardian ad litem shall also attach to the guardian's, limited
guardian's, guardian ad litem's, or limited guardian ad litem's annual guardianship
report a statement or affidavit of the ward, which is signed by the ward, providing an
annual review of the guardian's, limited guardian's, guardian ad litem's, or limited
guardian ad litem's performance; whether the ward requests the court to change or
terminate the guardianship; whether the ward feels safe in his or her housing, work, and
educational environment; how the ward is being treated by his or her guardian, limited
guardian, guardian ad litem, or limited guardian ad litem and any caregiver or other
similarly situated person; and any specific concerns the ward wants the court to know
and consider. The court shall take such statement or affidavit into consideration when
reviewing the guardian's, limited guardian's, guardian ad litem's, or limited guardian
ad litem's annual status report and when determining whether to continue, to reduce, or
to terminate the guardianship. Such report may be combined with the settlement of
accounts if the guardian is also conservator of the estate of the ward. The report shall be in
the form prescribed by the court and shall include the following information:
(1) The present address of the ward;
(2) The present address of the guardian;
(3) Unless the report specifies that the ward is living with the guardian, the number of
times the guardian has had contact with the ward, and the nature of such contacts including
the date the ward was last seen by the guardian;
(4) A summary of the guardian's visits with the ward and activities on the ward's
behalf and the extent to which the ward has participated in decisionmaking;
(5) If the ward is institutionalized, whether the guardian has received a copy of the
treatment or habilitation plan and, if so, the date of such plan, and whether the guardian
agrees with its provision;
(6) The date the ward was last seen by a physician or other professional and the
purpose;
(7) The current mental and physical condition of the ward and any major changes in
the ward's condition since the last report;

HB 2041 18
(8) The opinion of the guardian as to the need for the continuation of the guardianship
and whether it is necessary to increase or decrease the powers of the guardian; [and]
(9) A summarized plan for the coming year. If an individual support plan, treatment
plan, or plan of care is in place, such plan may be submitted in lieu of the requirements of this
subdivision;
(10) The guardianship classification; and
(11) Whether the ward is in compliance with any court order requiring or
prohibiting a specified act or action, term or condition of probation or parole, work
release program, sex offender registry, or housing requirement. If the ward is
noncompliant with any provision under this subdivision, the report shall state the
reasons for not being compliant and steps the guardian, limited guardian, guardian ad
litem, or limited guardian ad litem is taking to bring the ward into compliance.
3. The court shall seal any information that discusses, reveals, or provides
information regarding the ward's medical, psychological, psychiatric, mental health, or
other health care treatment, habilitation, support, or supervision plan provided by the
guardian, limited guardian, guardian ad litem, or limited guardian ad litem on a court
form or as an attachment. Any person, official, or entity wanting such information shall
file a petition with the probate court requesting the information and providing clear and
convincing evidence why the information is necessary or vital to a government
operation, need, right, or interest; that the person, official, or entity requires such
information for his or her petition to take over guardianship or conservatorship; or in
furtherance of any statutory duty, right, or authority. The person, official, or entity
shall provide a copy of the petition to the existing guardian or guardian ad litem, or
both, and ward and the notice of hearing on the petition. The court may, at its
discretion, conduct the hearing in person, by electronic means, or by telephone, but the
court shall take into consideration the financial means, undue harms the guardian or
guardian ad litem, or both, or ward would suffer, and any other lack of capabilities of
the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, and ward in making its decision on the type
of hearing to conduct on the petition.
4. The court may as part of its review, in its discretion, order the performance of a
mental status evaluation of the ward and may require any hospital, physician, or custodial
facility to submit copies of their records relating to the treatment, habilitation, or care of the
ward. The court, as part of its review and in its discretion, may also contact the department of
health and senior services or other appropriate agencies to investigate the conduct of the
guardian and report its findings to the court.
5. All records, reports, and evaluations provided to the court in the mental status
review shall be sealed by the court, and any person wanting any report, record, or

HB 2041 19
evaluation of the mental status review that was conducted shall comply with subsection
3 of this section. The guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, and ward shall not be
required to provide the requesting person, official, or entity a copy of any record,
report, or evaluation except by court order.
6. The court shall not act upon any notice or complaint filed with the court
directly or indirectly requesting the court to order a mental status evaluation of the
ward without the notice or complaint being signed and notarized under oath by the
filing person, official, or entity and upon the court receiving the signed and notarized
notice or complaint. Upon the court receiving the signed notarized notice or complaint,
the court shall provide the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, a copy of the notice
or complaint and provide the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, an opportunity to
be heard before the court decides whether to order the mental status evaluation. If it
becomes apparent to the court that the notice or complaint:
(1) Was filed with malice;
(2) Was filed to harass either the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, or the
ward;
(3) Was filed to inflict financial damages on the guardian or guardian ad litem,
or both, or the ward;
(4) Contained an allegation that was made in bad faith;
(5) Contained a knowingly false allegation; or
(6) Was filed to obstruct or prevent the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both,
from discharging any duty or exercising any authority,

100 the court may order the filing person, official, or entity to pay the guardian or guardian
101 ad litem, or both, or the ward all actual financial damages sustained by the guardian or
102 guardian ad litem, or both, or ward. If egregious conduct exists, the court may order
103 the person, official, or entity filing the notice or complaint to pay the guardian or ward
104 reasonable punitive damages.
105 [4.] 7. If there is an indication that the incapacity or disability of the ward or protectee
106 has ceased, the court shall appoint an attorney to file on behalf of the ward or protectee a
107 petition for termination of the guardianship or conservatorship or for restoration.
108 [5.] 8. If it appears to the court as part of its review or at any time upon motion of any
109 interested person, including the ward or protectee or some person on behalf of the ward or
110 protectee, that the guardian or conservator is not discharging the guardian's or conservator's
111 responsibilities and duties as required by this chapter or has not acted in the best interests of
112 the ward or protectee, the court may order that a hearing be held and direct that the guardian
113 or conservator appear before the court. In the event that such a hearing is ordered and the

HB 2041 20
114 ward or protectee is not represented by an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to
115 represent the ward or protectee in the proceedings. At the conclusion of the hearing, if the
116 court finds that the guardian or conservator is not discharging his or her duties and
117 responsibilities as required by this code or is not acting in the best interests of the ward or
118 protectee, the court shall enter such orders as it deems appropriate under the circumstances.
119 Such orders may include the removal of the guardian or conservator and the appointment of a
120 successor guardian or conservator or termination of the guardianship or conservatorship on
121 finding that the ward has recovered capacity or the protectee is no longer disabled. The court,
122 in framing its orders and findings, shall give due consideration to the exercise by the guardian
123 or conservator of any discretion vested in the guardian or conservator by law.
475.115. 1. When a guardian or conservator dies, is removed by order of the court, or
resigns and his or her resignation is accepted by the court, the court shall have the same
authority as it has in like cases over personal representatives and their sureties and may
appoint another guardian or conservator in the same manner and subject to the same
requirements as are herein provided for an original appointment of a guardian or conservator.
2. When determining whether to appoint a successor guardian or conservator, or
both, the court shall consider as evidence that the incapacitated or disabled person was
already appointed a guardian or conservator, or both. A person petitioning the court to
be a successor guardian or conservator, or both, shall not be required to reestablish
incapacity or a disability, or both, unless an oral or written objection is made by the
person who is being appointed a successor guardian or conservator, or both, because of
a substantial change in his or her capacity or disability indicating that the person no
longer requires a guardian or conservator, or both. The oral or written objection
providing that the person no longer requires a guardian or conservator, or both, because
of a substantial change in capacity or disability shall be confirmed by a physician, who
shall be subject to direct and cross examination.
3. If the court receives from one or more interested parties a simple request for
temporary appointment of guardianship or conservatorship, or both, to ensure the ward
has a guardian or conservator, or both, until the court can hear and rule on a formal
petition, the court shall review the request for temporary guardianship or
conservatorship, or both, and, upon the court selecting the best-suited appointment
based on the request and any exhibits provided, the court shall immediately appoint a
temporary guardian or conservator, or both, until such time as the court gives for the
parties to file a formal petition with the court. The appointment of a temporary
guardian or conservator, or both, shall have the same force and effect as any other
appointment for guardianship or conservator, or both.

HB 2041 21
4. A public administrator may request transfer of any case to the jurisdiction of
another county by filing a petition for transfer. If the public administrator of the receiving
county consents to the transfer, the court shall transfer the case. The court with jurisdiction
over the receiving county shall, without the necessity of any hearing as required by section
475.075, appoint the public administrator of the receiving county as successor guardian and/
or successor conservator and issue letters therein. In the case of a conservatorship, the final
settlement of the public administrator's conservatorship shall be filed within thirty days of the
court's transfer of the case, in the court with jurisdiction over the original conservatorship, and
forwarded to the receiving county upon audit and approval.
475.120. 1. The guardian of the person of a minor shall be entitled to the custody and
control of the ward and shall provide for the ward's education, support, and maintenance.
2. A guardian or limited guardian of an incapacitated person shall act in the best
interest of the ward. A limited guardian of an incapacitated person shall have the powers and
duties enumerated by the court in the adjudication order or any later modifying order.
3. [Except as otherwise limited by the court, a guardian shall make decisions
regarding the adult ward's support, care, education, health, and welfare. A guardian shall
exercise authority only as necessitated by the adult ward's limitations and, to the extent
possible, shall encourage the adult ward to participate in decisions, act on the adult ward's
own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the adult ward's personal affairs.]
The general powers and duties of a guardian of an incapacitated person shall be to take
charge of the ward and provide for the ward's care, treatment, habilitation, education,
support, and maintenance. However, the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, shall
not be financially liable for the ward's care, treatment, habilitation, education, support,
and maintenance. The powers and duties of guardians and guardians ad litem,
consistent with the ward's guardianship classification, shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(1) Assure that the ward resides in the best and least restrictive setting reasonably
available;
(2) Assure that the ward receives medical care and other services that are needed;
(3) Promote and protect the care, comfort, safety, health, and welfare of the ward;
(4) Provide required consents on behalf of the ward;
(5) Exercise authority and discharge duties necessary based on the ward's state
of incapacity or disability and the ward's guardianship classification;
(6) To the extent possible and practicable considering the ward's physical,
mental, and cognitive conditions and abilities, assist the ward in obtaining the lowest
guardianship classification level for the ward and encourage the ward to participate in
decision-making processes;

HB 2041 22
(7) To the extent possible and practicable considering the ward's physical,
mental, and cognitive conditions and abilities as the guardian or guardian ad litem, or
both, reasonably believes such conditions to be, assist the ward to act on the ward's own
behalf and develop or regain the capacity to manage the ward's personal affairs;
(8) Ensure the ward receives the proper level of structure, supervision, and
support needed and in accordance with the guardianship classification;
(9) Assist the ward, as the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, deems
appropriate for the ward, to comply with any and all terms and conditions of any court
order; any supervised or unsupervised probation, parole, or work release program; any
care, treatment, or habilitation program or service; and any sex offender or other
registration or housing restriction requirement;
(10) To exercise all powers and discharge all duties necessary or proper to implement
the provisions of this section.
4. Consistent with subsection 3 of this section and section 475.343, a guardian of
an adult or minor ward [is] shall not be obligated by virtue of such guardian's appointment to
use the guardian's own financial resources for the support, care, treatment, housing,
transportation, debt, fees, supervision, habilitation, maintenance, or other financial
costs of the ward. If the ward's estate and available public benefits are inadequate for the
proper care of the ward, the guardian or conservator may apply to the county commission
pursuant to section 475.370.
5. No guardian of the person shall have authority to seek admission of the guardian's
ward to a mental health or intellectual disability facility for more than thirty days for any
purpose without court order except as otherwise provided by law.
6. The ward shall not be committed or incarcerated in any government or
privately operated institution, facility, jail, prison, program, housing, or mental health
or psychiatric unit solely on the basis of being in a forensic guardianship, and the ward
shall not be denied participation in and the benefits from any government or privately
operated institution, facility, program, housing, or unit solely on the basis of being in a
forensic guardianship unless otherwise prohibited by a clearly established state or
federal law, rule, or regulation or any term or condition of a court order, probation,
parole, or any jail or prison work release program rule or regulation.
7. Only the director or chief administrative officer of a social service agency serving
as guardian of an incapacitated person, or such person's designee, is legally authorized to act
on behalf of the ward.
[7.] 8. A social service agency serving as guardian of an incapacitated person shall
notify the court within fifteen days after any change in the identity of the professional

HB 2041 23
individual who has primary responsibility for providing guardianship services to the
incapacitated person.
[8.] 9. Any social service agency serving as guardian may not provide other services
to the ward.
[9.] 10. In the absence of any written direction from the ward to the contrary, a
guardian may execute a preneed contract for the ward's funeral services, including cremation,
or an irrevocable life insurance policy to pay for the ward's funeral services, including
cremation, and authorize the payment of such services from the ward's resources. Nothing in
this section shall interfere with the rights of [next-of-kin] next of kin to direct the disposition
of the body of the ward upon death under section 194.119. If a preneed arrangement such as
that authorized by this subsection is in place and no [next-of-kin] next of kin exercises the
right of sepulcher within ten days of the death of the ward, the guardian may sign consents for
the disposition of the body, including cremation, without any liability therefor. A guardian
who exercises the authority granted in this subsection shall not be personally financially
responsible for the payment of services.
11. To ensure a statutory pathway exists for a ward to have equal access to the
courts and equal protection of law and due process if there is only a guardian and no
conservator appointed but the guardian is the payee of the ward, the guardian shall
institute all suits and prosecutions, with or without retaining legal counsel, that may be
necessary to recover property, debts, civil damages, punitive awards, papers, or other
estates of the ward. The guardian shall be substituted for the ward and institute and
prosecute the suit in the guardian's own name, as a real party in interest, in his or her
capacity as guardian and to prosecute the action, with or without retaining legal
counsel, as the guardian chooses citing this subsection in the petition or motion filed
with the court unless otherwise determined by a ruling of the Missouri supreme court.
12. To ensure a statutory pathway exists for a guardian to have equal access to
the courts and equal protection of law and due process if the guardian has suffered
economic or noneconomic damages by a person other than the ward or is obstructed or
prevented from discharging his or her duties or authority provided under this section,
the guardian shall have a cause of action independent of the ward to enforce his or her
duties and authority by court order and to remedy any economic or noneconomic
damages sustained as a real party in interest in the guardian's own name and capacity
as guardian and to prosecute the action with or without retaining legal counsel as the
guardian chooses. The guardian shall cite this subsection in the petition or motion filed
unless otherwise determined by a ruling of the Missouri supreme court.
100 13. A guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, shall receive notice and a copy of
101 any grievance, complaint, notice, petition, or motion filed against the guardian or

HB 2041 24
102 guardian ad litem, or both, under any section of this chapter or any other state or
103 federal law, rule, or regulation that alleges any breach of any guardianship fiduciary
104 duty or guardianship power or any violation of any other state or federal law, rule, or
105 regulation without any redaction being made to the grievance, complaint, notice,
106 petition, or motion. The guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, shall have an
107 opportunity to be heard by the court through responsive pleadings, motions, and court
108 hearings, with or without the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, retaining legal
109 counsel, and to proffer any and all evidence in his or her defense for the court to
110 consider. The guardian shall have the right to confront his or her accuser and witnesses
111 by direct and cross examination. If the court finds any part of the grievance, complaint,
112 notice, petition, or motion filed against the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both:
113 (1) Contains knowingly false or malicious allegations or is filed in bad faith or
114 with purpose to harass the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, or to obstruct or
115 prevent the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, from discharging his or her
116 guardianship duties or powers;
117 (2) Defames the character or reputation of the guardian or guardian ad litem, or
118 both; or
119 (3) Causes the guardian to suffer damages,
120
121 upon a motion filed by the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, the court shall order
122 the party or parties filing the grievance, complaint, notice, petition, or motion to pay the
123 guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, actual damages. If the court finds that the
124 grievance, complaint, notice, petition, or motion filed is egregious, the court shall also
125 grant the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, a reasonable monetary punitive award
126 and enter any and all other orders as the court deems just and proper.
475.361. 1. The provisions of section 475.078 notwithstanding to the contrary and
consistent with the ward's guardianship classification and the requirements, needs,
rights, and liberties arising from the guardianship classification, in every guardianship,
the ward has the right to:
(1) A guardian who acts in the best interests of the ward;
(2) A guardian who is reasonably accessible to the ward;
(3) Communicate freely and privately with family, friends, and other persons other
than the guardian; except that, such right may be limited by the guardian for good cause but
only as necessary to ensure the ward's condition, safety, habilitation, or sound therapeutic
treatment or such right may be restricted by a court order; any term or condition of
probation or parole; a work release program; or a state or federal statute, rule, or
regulation;

HB 2041 25
(4) Consult with his or her guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, in private if
the ward is being held in custody so that the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both,
may determine if the guardian or guardian ad litem, or both, shall invoke the ward's
rights against giving self-incriminating statements or to give any consent on behalf of
the ward to give statements;
(5) Individually or through the ward's representative, guardian or guardian ad
litem, or both, or legal counsel, bring an action relating to the guardianship, including the
right to file a petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied a right or privilege
granted by this chapter, including the right to bring an action to modify or terminate the
guardianship under the provisions of section 475.083;
[(5)] (6) The least restrictive form of guardianship assistance, taking into
consideration the ward's functional limitations, personal needs, and preferences, and any
legal or medical requirements imposed on the ward;
[(6)] (7) Be restored to capacity at the earliest possible time and, in accordance with
the ward's mental, physical, cognitive, and medical condition, be in the lowest
guardianship classification possible and practicable considering the ward's mental,
physical, cognitive, and medical condition and available treatment;
[(7)] (8) Receive information from the court that describes the ward's rights,
including rights the ward may seek by petitioning the court; and
[(8)] (9) Participate in any health care decision-making process.
2. Consistent with section 475.120, an adult ward may petition the court to grant the
ward the right to:
(1) Contract to marry or to petition for dissolution of marriage;
(2) Make, modify, or terminate other contracts or ratify contracts made by the ward;
(3) Consent to medical treatment;
(4) Establish a residence or dwelling place;
(5) Change domicile;
(6) Bring or defend any action at law or equity, in accordance with section 475.120,
except an action relating to the guardianship; or
(7) Drive a motor vehicle if the ward can pass the required driving test. The
provisions of this subdivision shall be subject to the court's review and any
determinations made by the court based on the ward's past motor vehicle driving
records and any driver's license suspensions or revocations in each state the ward has
resided in while able to legally drive.
3. The appointment of a guardian shall revoke the powers of an agent who was
previously appointed by the ward to act as an agent under a durable power of attorney for
health care[, unless the court so orders]. If a guardian is appointed in addition to the

HB 2041 26
agent, the court shall grant only a limited guardianship that excludesthe duties, powers,
and authority conferred upon the agent in a durable power of attorney.
4. The appointment of a guardian is not a determination that the ward lacks
testamentary capacity, but the ward's capacity shall be reviewable and determined by a
court of competent jurisdiction if the ward's capacity is disputed.
✔